Lecture6/fin_cons_grad.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+N	 ! Noun tag
	+Sg	  ! Singular tag
	+Ptv	   ! Partitive
	+Gen	    ! Genitive

LEXICON Root
0:#	NounStems ;

LEXICON NounStems
sika	N_BackVowel ;
papu	N_BackVowel ;
sota	N_BackVowel ;
kukka	N_BackVowel ;
loppu	N_BackVowel ;
matto	N_BackVowel ;
tiuku	N_BackVowel ;
puku	N_BackVowel ;
kurke	N_BackVowel ;
vanki	N_BackVowel ;
kumpu	N_BackVowel ;
ranta	N_BackVowel ;
ilta	N_BackVowel ;
parta	N_BackVowel ;
aika	N_BackVowel ;
poika	N_BackVowel ;

LEXICON N_BackVowel
+N+Sg:0		Case_BackVowel ;

LEXICON N_FrontVowel
+N+Sg:0		Case_FrontVowel ;

LEXICON Case_BackVowel
+Ptv:a#		# ;	! Partitive ends in a
+Gen:n# 	# ;

LEXICON Case_FrontVowel
+Ptv:ä#		# ;	! Partitive ends in ä
+Gen:n# 	# ;

END
